Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 15. Miscellaneous Provisions

38-13-1501.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 461, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1502.
Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This article 13 modifies, limits, or supersedes the “Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act”, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 (c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 (b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003 (b).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 461, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1503.
Transitional provision.

An initial report filed under this article 13 for property that was not required to be reported before July 1, 2020, but that is required to be reported under this article 13, must include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the five-year period preceding July 1, 2020, as if this article 13 had been in effect during that period.

This article 13 does not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before July 1, 2020, to report, pay, or deliver property. Subject to section 38-13-609, a holder that did not comply with the law governing unclaimed property before July 1, 2020, is subject to applicable provisions for enforcement and penalties in effect before July 1, 2020.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 461, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1504.
Application of article - local government - exemption - notice of property.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of this article 13 do not apply to a local government that is a holder of property if:

The local government has a local ordinance or resolution relating to the disposition of property that conflicts with this article 13;

The local ordinance or resolution described in subsection (1)(a) of this section requires the local government to hold the property for the owner for at least five years after the date it is presumed abandoned under section 38-13-201 (1)(j); and

The local government provides the administrator with the information described in subsection (2) of this section in the same electronic format as a holder is required to use to report unclaimed property.

To satisfy subsection (1)(c) of this section, a local government must provide the administrator with the following information on or before November 1 of each year:

An alphabetical list of the owners for whom the local government holds property that is presumed abandoned under section 38-13-201 (1)(j); and

The value of the abandoned property that the exempt local government holds for each owner.

The administrator shall include the information received in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, along with a statement that a person claiming to be the owner must file a claim for the property with the specific local government that has the property, as part of the website or database maintained under section 38-13-503 (3).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 461, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.